Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 25
NONRESIDENT VIOLATOR COMPACT

Sec.

§ 49-2501. Enactment of compact.

The nonresident violator compact hereinafter called “the compact” is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

§ 49-2502. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2503. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 49-2504 — 49-2514. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-2515. Severability. [Repealed.]